Hawaii, session 2026, GM1280.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. This Act shall be known and may be cited as the
Judiciary Supplemental Appropriations Act of 2026.
SECTION 2. Act 227, Session Laws of Hawaii 2025, is
amended as follows:
1. By amending part II to read:
"PART II. PROGRAM APPROPRIATIONS
SECTION 3. The following sums, or so much thereof as may
be sufficient to accomplish the purposes and programs designated
herein, are appropriated or authorized from the sources of
funding specified to the judiciary for the fiscal biennium
beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027. The total
expenditures and the number of permanent and temporary positions
established in each fiscal year of the fiscal biennium shall not
exceed the sums and the position ceilings indicated for each
year, except as provided in this Act.
2026-3502 HB2095 CDl HMSO

Page 2 2095
H.B. NO.
H.D. 2
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
PROGRAM APPROPRIATIONS
APPROPRIATIONS
FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROG. EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. ID PROGRAM AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
The Judicial System
1. JUDIOI - COURTS OF APPEAL
85.00* 85.00*
0.48# 0.48#
OPERATING JUD 9,592,659A [-
9,962,313A

2. JUD310 - FIRST JUDICIAL CIRCUIT •
1,115.50* [---- 1/115.50*]
1,117.50*
57.58# [------- 57 ■.■58#]
55.58#
OPERATING JUD 98,130,866A [-—98-r2^«-r8^0^]
100,168,607A
35.00* 35.00*
JUD 4,261,273B 4,261,273B

3. JUD320 - SECOND JUDICIAL CIRCUIT
210.50* 210.50*
1.68# 1.68#
OPERATING JUD 20,093,034A [-
20,331,034A

4. JUD330 - THIRD JUDICIAL CIRCUIT
246.00* [------ 246.00*]
247.00*
5.20# [---------5.20#]
4.20#
OPERATING JUD 24,912,104A [-—
25,274,522A

5. JUD350 - FIFTH JUDICIAL CIRCUIT
103.00* 103.00*
2.60# 2.60#
OPERATING JUD 9, 159, 756A [--- 9vl&&,756A]
9,291,556A

6. JUD501 - JUDICIAL SELECTION COMMISSION
1.00* 1.00*
OPERATING JUD 114,074A 114,074A
2026-3502 HB2095 GDI HMSO 2

Page 3 2095
H.B. NO.
H.D. 2
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
PROGRAM APPROPRIATIONS
APPROPRIATIONS
FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROG. EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. ID PROGRAM AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F

7. JUD601 - ADMINISTRATION
234.50* [------
235.50*
8.48# 8.48#
OPERATING JUD 39,723,183A [- 3-7,3^3,-371 A]
40,842,308A
1.00* [--------
0.00*
9.00# 9.00#
JUD 8,241,219B [-—8-r-M4rr2JrW]
8,178,123B
JUD 343,261W 343,261W
INVESTMENT CAPITAL JUD 12,900,000C [-----------0€]
45,400,0000"
2026-3502 HB2095 CDl HMSO 3

Page 4
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
2. By amending parts IV and V to read:
"PART IV. CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
SECTION 8. The sum of $58,300,000
appropriated or authorized in part II of this Act for capital
improvement projects shall be expended by the judiciary for the
projects listed below; provided that several related or similar
projects may be combined into a single project, if a combination
is advantageous or convenient for implementation; provided
further that the total cost of the projects thus combined shall
not exceed the total of the sums specified for the projects
separately. The amount after each cost element and the total
funding for each project listed in this part are in thousands of
dollars.
2026-3502 HB2095 CDl HMSO

Page 5 2095
H.B. NO
H.D. 2
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
PROGRAM APPROPRIATIONS
APPROPRIATIONS
FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROG. EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. ID PROGRAM AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
A. ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
JUD601 - ADMINISTRATION

1. KAUAI JUDICIARY COMPLEX CHILLER
[fiSWAGBMBiW] REPLACEMENTS, KAUAI

PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION^ AND
EQUIPMENT FOR THE REPLACEMENT OF [A]
KAUAI JUDICIARY COMPLEX CHILLER
[UWKPJUNI^.
TOTAL FUNDING JUD 900 C 1,200 C

1.1 HALE KAULIKE AC EQUIPMENT, HAWAII

PLANS, CONSTRUCTION AND EQUIPMENT FOR
THE REPLACEMENT OF A HAWAII JUDICIARY
COMPLEX CHILLER UNIT.
TOTAL FUNDING _C 1,200 C

1.2 KAAHUMANU HALE ELEVATORS, OAHU

DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR ELEVATOR
SYSTEMS UPGRADES AND MODERNIZATION AT
KAAHUMANU HALE, OAHU.
TOTAL FUNDING JUD _c 15, 000 C

2. LUMP SUM CIP FOR JUDICIARY
FACILITIES, STATEWIDE

PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND
EQUIPMENT FOR GENERAL ALTERATIONS,
UPGRADES, AND IMPROVEMENTS TO JUDICIARY
FACILITIES, STATEWIDE.
TOTAL FUNDING JUD 8,000 C 8, 000 C

3. SOUTH KOHALA DISTRICT COURTHOUSE,



MllUJ / UEj O J-
AND EQUIPMENT FOR A NEW SOUTH KOHALA
DISTRICT COURTHOUSE.

TOTAL FUNDING JUD 4,000 C 20, 000 C
2026-3502 HB2095 GDI HMSO
■■iiiiiigiHiiiiiwiiBiin

Page 6
H.B. NO. T.
h
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
PART V. ISSUANCE OF BONDS
SECTION 9. General obligation bonds may be issued, as
provided by law, to yield the amount that may be necessary to
finance projects authorized in part II and listed ih part IV of
this Act; provided that the sum total of the general obligation
bonds so issued shall not exceed [$12,9-00,0-6-0] $58,300,000."
SECTION 3. If any portion of this Act or its application
to any person or circumstances is held to be invalid for any
reason, the remainder of the Act and any provision thereof shall
not be affected. If any portion of a specific appropriation is
held to be invalid for any reason, the remaining portion shall
be independent of the invalid portion and shall be expended to
fulfill the objective and intent of the appropriation to the
extent possible.
SECTION 4. If any manifest clerical, typographical, or
other mechanical error is found in this Act, the chief justice
may correct the error. All changes made pursuant to this
section shall be reported to the legislature at its next regular
session.
SECTION 5. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
2026-3502 HB2095 CDl HMSO 6

Page 7
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
SECTION 6. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2026-3502 HB2095 CDl HMSO 7
iMHiniiiiiHiiiiiiiiiiHiin

2095
H.B. NO
H.D. 2
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 26th day of June , 2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 2095, HD 2, SD 2, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L, Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B. No. 2095, H.D. 2, S.D. 2, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAI‘1
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
Clerk of the Senate
158-26